test/src/morphology/numeral-roots_gt-norm.yaml
# yaml test generated from src/morphology/stems/numeral.lexc with doccomments2yaml.awk
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst

Tests:
  NUM_CARD_ALL: #
    yksi+Num+Card+Sg+Nom: yksi # 
    viisi+Num+Card+Sg+All: viidelle # 
    tuhat+Num+Card+Sg+Par: tuhatta # 
  NUM_CARD_SUFFIX: #
    viisi+Num+Card+Sg+Nom+Use/Circ#kymmenen+Num+Card+Sg+Par: viisikymmentä # 
    viisi+Num+Card+Sg+Nom+Use/Circ#kymmentä: viisikymmentä # 
    neljä+Num+Card+Sg+Nom+Use/Circ#sata+Num+Card+Sg+Par+Use/Circ#tuhatta: neljäsataatuhatta # 
  NUM_ORD_ALL: #
    neljäs+Num+Ord+Sg+Nom: neljäs # 
    viides+Num+Ord+Sg+All: viidennelle # 
    tuhannes+Num+Ord+Sg+Par: tuhannetta # 
  NUM_ORD_SUFFIX: #
    viides+Num+Ord+Sg+Nom+Use/Circ#kymmenes: viideskymmenes # 
    neljäs+Num+Ord+Sg+Nom+Use/Circ#sadas+Num+Ord+Sg+Nom+Use/Circ#tuhannes: neljässadastuhannes # 
  NUM_OTHERS: #
    viitisen+Num#kymmentä: viitisenkymmentä # 
    puolikymmentä+Num+Sg+Nom: puolikymmentä # 
